Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 42 Wyoming Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1, also enacted a chapter 42 of title 26. That chapter has been renumbered as chapter 43 of title 26.

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2003, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, requests Congress to equalize the tax treatment of employer-provided and individually purchased health insurance by creating a tax credit for the full amount of insurance purchased by individuals since the high cost of health insurance has created a large number of uninsured citizens in the United States and the State, those without health insurance are less likely to receive adequate health care, insurance purchasing decisions are to a large extent made by employers and not insurance beneficiaries, overreliance on employer-provided health insurance impedes worker mobility, spiraling health care costs are in part caused by a lack of active consumer participation in health care markets, and employers can deduct the full cost of employee health insurance as a business expense, while individuals may not.

§ 26-42-101.
Short title.

This chapter is known as the “Wyoming Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act.”

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1.

§ 26-42-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Account” means any of the three (3) accounts created by W.S.

26-42-104

(a);

“Association” means the Wyoming life and health insurance guaranty association created by W.S.

26-42-104

;

“Authorized assessment” or the term “authorized” when used in the context of assessments means a resolution by the board of directors has been passed whereby an assessment will be called immediately or in the future from member insurers for a specified amount. An assessment is authorized when the resolution is passed;

“Benefit plan” means a specific employee, union or association of natural persons benefit plan;

“Called assessment” or the term “called” when used in the context of assessments means that a notice has been issued by the association to member insurers requiring that an authorized assessment be paid within the time frame set forth within the notice. An authorized assessment becomes a called assessment when notice is mailed by the association to member insurers;

“Contractual obligation” means any obligation under a policy or contract or certificate under a group policy or contract, or portion thereof for which coverage is provided under W.S.

26-42-103

;

“Covered policy” or “covered contract” means any policy or contract or portion of a policy or contract for which coverage is provided by W.S.

26-42-103

;

“Extra-contractual claims” shall include claims relating to bad faith in the payment of claims, punitive or exemplary damages or attorneys’ fees and costs;

“Impaired insurer” means a member insurer which is not an insolvent insurer and is placed under an order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction;

“Insolvent insurer” means a member insurer which after the effective date of this act, is placed under an order of liquidation by a court of competent jurisdiction with a finding of insolvency;

“Member insurer” means any insurer or health maintenance organization which is licensed or holds a certificate of authority to transact in this state any kind of insurance or health maintenance organization business for which coverage is provided by W.S. 26-42-103 and includes any insurer or health maintenance organization business whose license or certificate of authority in this state may have been suspended, revoked, not renewed or voluntarily withdrawn, but does not include:

Repealed By Laws 1997, ch. 125, § 1.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 210, § 5.

A fraternal benefit society;

A mandatory state pooling plan;

A stipulated premium insurance company;

A local mutual burial association;

A mutual assessment company or any entity that operates on an assessment basis;

An insurance exchange; or

Any entity similar to any of the above.

“Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average” means the Monthly Average Corporates as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereto;

“Owner” of a policy or contract, “contract owner”, “policyholder” and “policy owner” mean the person who is identified as the legal owner under the terms of the policy or contract or who is otherwise vested with legal title to the policy or contract through a valid assignment completed in accordance with the terms of the policy or contract and properly recorded as the owner on the books of the member insurer. The terms “owner”, “contract owner”, “policyholder” and “policy owner” do not include persons with a mere beneficial interest in a policy or contract;

“Plan sponsor” means:

The employer in the case of a benefit plan established or maintained by a single employer;

The employee organization in the case of a benefit plan established or maintained by an employee organization; or

In a case of a benefit plan established or maintained by two (2) or more employers or jointly by one (1) or more employers and one (1) or more employee organizations, the association, committee, joint board of trustees or other similar group of representatives of the parties who establish or maintain the benefit plan.

“Premiums” means amounts received on covered policies or contracts less premiums, considerations and deposits returned thereon, and less dividends and experience credits thereon, but does not include any amounts received for any policies or contracts or for the portions of any policies or contracts for which coverage is not provided by W.S. 26-42-103(b) except that assessable premium shall not be reduced due to W.S. 26-42-103(c)(iii) relating to interest limitations and W.S. 26-42-103(d)(ii) relating to limitations with respect to any one (1) individual, one (1) participant and one (1) policy owner or contract owner. “Premiums” shall not include:

Premiums on an unallocated annuity contract; or

With respect to multiple nongroup policies of life insurance owned by one (1) owner, whether the policy owner or contract owner is an individual, firm, corporation or other person, and whether the persons insured are officers, managers, employees or other persons, premiums in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) with respect to these policies or contracts, regardless of the number of policies or contracts held by the owner.

“Principal place of business” of:

A plan sponsor or a person other than a natural person means the single state in which the natural persons who establish policy for the direction, control and coordination of the operations of the entity as a whole primarily exercise that function, determined by the association in its reasonable judgment by considering the following factors:

The state in which the primary executive and administrative headquarters of the entity is located;

The state in which the principal office of the chief executive officer of the entity is located;

The state in which the board of directors, or similar governing person or persons, of the entity conducts the majority of its meetings;

The state in which the executive or management committee of the board of directors, or similar governing person or persons, of the entity conducts the majority of its meetings;

The state from which the management of the overall operations of the entity is directed; and

In the case of a benefit plan sponsored by affiliated companies comprising a consolidated corporation, the state in which the holding company or controlling affiliate has its principal place of business as determined using the above factors. However, in the case of a plan sponsor, if more than fifty percent (50%) of the participants in the benefit plan are employed in a single state, that state shall be deemed the principal place of business for the plan sponsor.

A plan sponsor of a benefit plan shall be deemed to be the principal place of business of the association, committee, joint board of trustees or other similar group of representatives of the parties who establish or maintain the benefit plan that, in lieu of a specific or clear designation of a principal place of business, shall be deemed to be the principal place of business or the employer or employee organization that has the largest investment in the benefit plan in question.

“Receivership court” means the court in the insolvent or impaired insurer’s state having jurisdiction over the conservation, rehabilitation or liquidation of the member insurer;

“Resident” means a person to whom a contractual obligation is owed and who resides in this state on the date of entry of a court order that determines a member insurer to be an impaired insurer or a court order that determines a member insurer to be an insolvent insurer. A person may be a resident of only one (1) state, which in the case of a person other than a natural person is its principal place of business. Citizens of the United States who are either residents of foreign countries or residents of United States possessions, territories or protectorates that do not have an association similar to the association created by this act, shall be deemed residents of the state of domicile of the member insurer that issued the policies or contracts;

“Structured settlement annuity” means an annuity purchased in order to fund periodic payments for a plaintiff or other claimant in payment for or with respect to personal injury suffered by the plaintiff or other claimant;

“Supplemental contract” means a written agreement entered into for the distribution of proceeds under a life, health or annuity policy or life, health or annuity contract;

“Unallocated annuity contract” means an annuity contract or group annuity certificate which is not issued to and owned by an individual, except to the extent of any annuity benefits guaranteed to an individual by an insurer under the contract or certificate;

“Enrollee” means an individual who is enrolled in a health maintenance organization;

“Health benefit plan” means any hospital or medical expense policy or certificate, or health maintenance organization subscriber contract or any other similar health contract. “Health benefit plan” does not include any of the following:

Accident only insurance;

Credit insurance;

Dental only insurance;

Vision only insurance;

Medicare supplement insurance;

Benefits for long term care, home health care, community based care or any combination thereof;

Disability income insurance;

Coverage for on-site medical clinics;

Specified disease, hospital confinement indemnity or limited benefit health issuance if the types of coverage do not provide coordination of benefits and are provided under separate policies or certificates.

“This act” means W.S.

26-42-101

through

26-42-118

.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 1995, ch. 210, § 5; 1997, ch. 125, § 1; 2014 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(vii), added "or `covered contract'," in the introductory language in (a)(xi), substituted "any insurer or health maintenance organization which" for "any insurer which" and added "or health maintenance organization business" twice, in (a)(xiii), added "`policyholder" twice and substituted "books of the member insurer" for "books of the insurer," in the introductory language in (a)(xv), substituted "one (1) policy owner or contract owner" for "one (1) contract owner," in (a)(xv)(B), substituted "nongroup" for non-group" and "policy owner or contract owner" for "policy owner," in (a)(xvii) and (a)(xiii), substituted "of the member insurer" for "of the insurer," added (a)(xxii) and (a)(xxiii), and redesignated former (a)(xxii) as (a)(xxiv).

Editor’s notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(vii)(I) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Guaranty as covering renewals, after revocation, of claims within coverage at time of revocation, 58 ALR5th 325.

§ 26-42-103.
Coverage and limitations.

This act shall provide coverage for the policies and contracts specified in subsection (b) of this section and provide coverage as follows:

To persons who are owners, certificate holders or enrollees under the policies or contracts other than structured settlement annuities and in each case who:

Are residents; or

Are not residents but only under all of the following conditions:

The member insurer that issued the policies or contracts is domiciled in this state;

The states in which the persons reside have associations similar to the association created by this act; and

The persons are not eligible for coverage by an association in any other state due to the fact that the insurer or health maintenance organization was not licensed in the state at the time specified in the state’s guaranty association law.

To persons who are the beneficiaries, assignees or payees of the persons described in paragraph (a)(i) of this section, including health care providers rendering services covered under health insurance policies or certificates, regardless of where they reside except for nonresident certificate holders under group policies or contracts;

For structured settlement annuities specified in subsection (b) of this section, paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection shall not apply, and this act shall, except as provided in paragraphs (iv) and (v) of this subsection, provide coverage to a person who is a payee under a structured settlement annuity or beneficiary of a payee if the payee is deceased, if the payee:

Is a resident, regardless of where the contract owner resides; or

Is not a resident, but only under both of the following conditions:

The contract owner of the structured settlement annuity is a resident, or the contract owner of the structured settlement annuity is not a resident, but the insurer that issued the structured settlement annuity is domiciled in this state and the state in which the contract owner resides has an association similar to the association created by this act; and

Neither the payee or beneficiary of the contract owner nor the contract owner is eligible for coverage by the association of the state in which the payee or contract owner resides.

This act shall not provide coverage to:

A person who is a payee or beneficiary of a contract owner resident of this state, if the payee or beneficiary is afforded any coverage by the association of another state; or

A person who acquires rights to receive payments through a structured settlement factoring transaction as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 5891(c)(3)(A), regardless if the transaction occurred before or after 26 U.S.C. § 5891(c)(3)(A) became effective.

This act is intended to provide coverage to a person who is a resident of this state and, in special circumstances, to a nonresident. In order to avoid duplicate coverage, if a person who would otherwise receive coverage under this act is provided coverage under the laws of any other state, the person shall not be provided coverage under this act. In determining the application of the provisions of this paragraph in situations where a person could be covered by the association of more than one (1) state, whether as an owner, payee, enrollee, beneficiary or assignee, this act shall be construed in conjunction with other state laws to result in coverage by only one (1) association.

This act shall provide coverage to persons specified in subsection (a) of this section for policies or contracts of direct, nongroup life insurance, health insurance including health maintenance organization subscriber contracts and certificates, annuities and supplemental contracts to any of these policies or contracts and for certificates under direct group policies and contracts issued by member insurers except as limited by this act. Annuity contracts and certificates under group annuity contracts include allocated funding agreements, structured settlement annuities and any immediate or deferred annuity contracts.

This act shall not provide coverage for:

Any portion of a policy or contract not guaranteed by the insurer or under which the risk is borne by the policyholder or contract holder;

Any policy or contract of reinsurance unless assumption certificates have been issued pursuant to the reinsurance policy or contract;

Excluding any portion of a policy or contract, including a rider, that provides long term care or other health insurance benefits, any portion of a policy or contract to the extent that the rate of interest on which it is based:

Averaged over the period of four (4) years prior to the date on which the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this act, exceeds a rate of interest determined by subtracting two (2) percentage points from Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average averaged for that same four (4) year period or for a lesser period if the policy or contract was issued less than four (4) years before the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this act; and

On and after the date on which the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this act, exceeds the rate of interest determined by subtracting three (3) percentage points from the most recent and available Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average.

Any portion of a policy or contract issued to a plan or program of an employer, association or other person to provide life, health or annuity benefits to its employees,members or others to the extent that the plan or program is self-funded or uninsured, including but not limited to benefits payable by an employer, association or similar entity under:

A multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in Section 3(40) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. § 1002(40);

A minimum premium group insurance plan;

A stop-loss group insurance plan; or

An administrative services only contract.

Any portion of a policy or contract to the extent it provides dividends or experience rating credits, voting rights or provides payment of any fees or allowances to any person, including the policyholder or contract holder, in connection with the service to or administration of the policy or contract;

Any policy or contract issued in this state by a member insurer at a time when it was not licensed or did not have a certificate of authority to issue the policy or contract in this state;

Any annuity contract or group annuity certificate which is not issued to and not owned by an individual, except to the extent of any annuity benefits guaranteed to an individual by an insurer under the contract or certificate;

Any annuity contract or group annuity certificate which is issued by a nonprofit insurance company exclusively for the benefit of nonprofit educational institutions and their employees for the purpose of providing retirement benefits;

A portion of a policy or contract to the extent that the assessments required by W.S.

26-42-107

with respect to the policy or contract are preempted or otherwise not permitted by federal or state law;

An obligation that does not arise under the express written terms of the policy or contract issued by the member insurer to the enrollee, certificate holder, contract owner or policy owner, including without limitation:

Claims based on marketing materials;

Claims based on side letters, riders or other documents that were issued by the member insurer without meeting applicable policy or contract form filing or approval requirements;

Misrepresentations of or regarding policy or contract benefits;

Extra-contractual claims; or

A claim for penalties or consequential or incidental damages.

A contractual agreement that establishes the member insurer’s obligations to provide a book value accounting guaranty for defined contribution benefit plan participants by reference to a portfolio of assets that is owned by the benefit plan or its trustee, which in each case is not an affiliate of the member insurer;

An unallocated annuity contract;

A policy or contract providing any hospital, medical, prescription drug or other health care benefits pursuant to Part C or Part D of Subchapter XVIII, Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code (commonly known as Medicare Part C & D) or Subchapter XIX, Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code (commonly known as Medicaid) or any regulations issued pursuant thereto;

A portion of a policy or contract to the extent it provides for interest or other changes in value to be determined by the use of an index or other external reference stated in the policy or contract, but which have not been credited to the policy or contract, or as to which the policy or contract owner’s rights are subject to forfeiture, as of the date the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this act, whichever is earlier. If a policy’s or contract’s interest or changes in value are credited less frequently than annually, then for purposes of determining the values that have been credited and are not subject to forfeiture under this provision, the interest or change in value determined by using the procedures defined in the policy or contract will be credited as if the contractual date of crediting interest or changing values was the date of impairment or insolvency, whichever is earlier, and will not be subject to forfeiture;

Structured settlement annuity benefits to which a payee or beneficiary has transferred his rights in a structured settlement factoring transaction as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 5891(c)(3)(A), regardless if the transaction occurred before or after 26 U.S.C. § 5891(c)(3)(A) became effective.

The benefits for which the association may be liable shall in no event exceed the lesser of:

The contractual obligations for which the member insurer is liable or would have been liable if it was not an impaired or insolvent insurer; or

With respect to any one (1) life, regardless of the number of policies or contracts:

Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00) in life insurance death benefits but not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) in net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values for life insurance;

For health insurance benefits:

One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) for coverages not defined as disability insurance, disability income insurance, health benefit plan or long term care insurance including any net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values;

Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00) for disability insurance, disability income insurance and long-term care insurance;

Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00) for health benefit plans.

Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) in the present value of annuity benefits including net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values;

With respect to each payee of a structured settlement annuity or beneficiary or beneficiaries of the payee if deceased, two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) in present value annuity benefits, in the aggregate, including net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values;

However, in no event shall the association be obligated to cover more than:

An aggregate of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) in benefits with respect to any one (1) life under paragraphs (A) through (D) of this subsection; or

With respect to one (1) owner of multiple nongroup policies of life insurance, whether the policy owner or contract owner is an individual, firm, corporation or other person, and whether the persons insured are officers, managers, employees or other persons, more than five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) in benefits, regardless of the number of policies and contracts held by the owner.

The limitations set forth in this subsection are limitations on the benefits for which the association is obligated before taking into account either its subrogation and assignment rights or the extent to which those benefits could be provided out of the assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer attributable to covered policies. The costs of the association’s obligations under this act may be met by the use of assets attributable to covered policies or reimbursed to the association pursuant to its subrogation and assignment rights;

For purposes of this act, benefits provided by a long term care rider to a life insurance policy or annuity contract shall be considered the same type of benefits as the base life insurance policy or annuity contract to which it relates;

The liability of the association is strictly limited by the express terms of the covered policies and contracts and by the provisions of this act and is not affected by the contents of any brochures, illustrations, advertisements or oral statements by agents, brokers or others used or made in connection with their sale. The association is not liable for any extracontractual, exemplary or punitive damages, attorney’s fees or interest other than as provided for by the terms of such policies or contracts, as limited by this act.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 21, § 2.

In performing its obligations to provide coverage under W.S.

26-42-106

, the association shall not be required to guarantee, assume, reinsure, reissue or perform, or cause to be guaranteed, assumed, reinsured, reissued or performed, the contractual obligations of the insolvent or impaired insurer under a covered policy or contract that do not materially affect the economic values or economic benefits of the covered policy or contract.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 2012, ch. 36, § 1; 2014 ch. 21, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, rewrote (d)(ii)(B) and (C) to increase limits on annuity and health insurance benefits liability of life and health insurance guarantee association.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a)(i), added "or enrollees" and made related changes, in (a)(i)(B)(I), substituted "The member insurer" for "The insurer," in (a)(i)(B)(III), added "or health maintenance organization," in (a)(ii), added "including health care providers rendering services covered under health insurance policies or certificates," added (a)(iv)(A) designation, and (a)(iv)(B), and made related changes, in (a)(v), added "enrollee"; in (b), substituted "policies or contracts of direct, nongroup life insurance, health insurance including health maintenance organization subscriber contracts and certificates, annuities and supplemental contracts to any of these policies or contracts" for "direct, nongroup life, health, annuity and supplemental policies or contracts"; in the introductory language in (c)(iii), added "Excluding any portion of a policy or contract, including a rider, that provides long term care or other health insurance benefits," in the introductory language in (c)(x), substituted "member insurer to the enrollee, certificate holder, contract owner" for "insurer to the contract owner," in (c)(x)(B), added "member" preceding "insurer" and "or contract" following "policy"; in (c)(x)(C), added "or contract," in (c)(xiii) added "or Subchapter XIX, Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code (commonly known as Medicaid)," added (c)(xv); in (d)(i), added "member" preceding "insurer," in the introductory language in (d)(ii)(B), substituted "For" for "In," in (d)(ii)(B)(I), substituted "health benefit plan" for "or basic hospital, medical and surgical insurance or major medical insurance" and made related changes, in (d)(ii)(B)(II) substituted "health benefit plans" for "basic hospital, medical and surgical insurance or major medical insurance," in (d)(ii)(E)(I), added "paragraphs (A) through (D) of," in (d)(ii)(E)(II), added "or contract owner," added (d)(ii)(G); and in (g), added "reissue" with variation.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote the section.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsections (a) through (c) and (e), see § 26-42-102(a)(xii).

§ 26-42-104.
Creation of the association.

There is created a nonprofit legal entity to be known as the Wyoming life and health insurance guaranty association. All member insurers are members of the association as a condition of their authority to transact insurance or health maintenance organization business in this state. The association shall perform its functions under the plan of operation established and approved under W.S.

26-42-108

and shall exercise its powers through a board of directors provided by W.S.

26-42-105

. For purposes of administration and assessment the association shall maintain the three (3) following accounts:

The life insurance account;

The health account; and

The annuity account.

The association is under the supervision of the commissioner and is subject to the applicable provisions of the insurance laws of this state. Meetings or records of the association may be opened to the public upon majority vote of the board of directors of the association.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 2019 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), added "or health maintenance organization business," and in (a)(ii), substituted "health account" for "health insurance account."

§ 26-42-105.
Board of directors.

The board of directors of the association consists of not less than five (5) nor more than nine (9) member insurers serving terms as established in the plan of operation provided by W.S.

26-42-108

. Membership on the board shall be subject to the following:

The members of the board shall be selected by member insurers subject to the approval of the commissioner;

A majority of the members shall be domestic insurers. If there are not enough domestic insurers for a majority, then all domestic insurers shall be on the board. The domestic insurers shall hold the positions of chairman and at least one (1) other officer position on the board if possible;

Each member insurer selected shall identify the individual representing the member insurer on the board and shall provide the individual’s name, address, biographical information and position in an affidavit to the commissioner for review and approval;

Vacancies on the board shall be filled for the remaining period of the term by a majority vote of the remaining board members subject to the approval of the commissioner.

In approving selections or in appointing members to the board, the commissioner shall consider, among other factors, whether all member insurers are fairly represented.

Members of the board shall be reimbursed from the assets of the association for expenses incurred by them as members of the board of directors. Members of the board shall not otherwise be compensated by the association for their services.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 108, § 1; 2014 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a), deleted the last two sentences which read: “To select the initial board of directors and initially organize the association, the commissioner shall give notice to all member insurers of the time and place of the organizational meeting. In determining voting rights at the organizational meeting each member insurer is entitled to one (1) vote in person or by proxy. If the board of directors is not selected within sixty (60) days after notice of the organizational meeting, the commissioner shall appoint the initial members.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, designated former (a) as the introductory language of (a), (a)(i), and (a)(iv) and made stylistic changes; in the introductory language of (a) added the last sentence; in (a)(i) and (a)(iv) substituted “shall be” for “are”; and added (a)(ii) and (a)(iii).